apertium-evn.evn-relaxed.lexc
LEXICON CASE-OBL-OBLIGATORY-POSS

%<acc%>%<def%>:%>%{V%}%{Э%} POSS-SG-PX ;
%<acc%>%<def%>:%>%{Б%}%{Э%} POSS-SG-PX ; ! Dir/LR
%<acc%>%<def%>: POSS-REF ;
%<acc%>%<ind%>:%>%{ъ%}%{Е%} POSS-SG-REF ;
!%<acc%>%<ind%>: POSS-REF ; ! check
%<datloc%>:%>%{D%}у%{ː%} POSS-SG-REF ;
%<locall%>:%>%{D%}%{u%}л%{Э%}%{ː%} POSS-SG-REF ;
%<all%>:%>т%{i%}ки%{ː%} POSS-SG-REF ;
%<prl%>:%>%{D%}%{u%}ли%{ː%}  POSS-SG-REF ;
%<locdir%>:%>%{i%}кл%{Э%}%{ː%} POSS-SG-REF ;
%<allprl%>:%>%{i%}кли%{ː%} POSS-SG-REF ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}ук POSS-SG-REF ;
%<ela%>:%>%{G%}ит%{д%} POSS-SG-REF ;
%<com-nun%>:%>нун POSS-SG-N-REF ;
%<com-nan%>:%>н%{Э%}н POSS-SG-N-REF ;
%<com-gali%>:%>%{G%}%{Э%}ли POSS-SG-REF ;

LEXICON CASE-OBL-POSS

%<acc%>%<def%>:%>%{V%}%{Э%} POSS-SG-WITHOUT-REF ;
%<acc%>%<def%>:%>%{Б%}%{Э%} POSS-SG-WITHOUT-REF ; ! Dir/LR
%<acc%>%<def%>: POSS-REF ;
%<acc%>%<ind%>:%>%{ъ%}%{Е%} POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
!%<acc%>%<ind%>: POSS-REF ; ! check
%<datloc%>:%>%{D%}у%{ː%} POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
%<locall%>:%>%{D%}%{u%}л%{Э%}%{ː%} POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
%<all%>:%>т%{i%}ки%{ː%} POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
%<prl%>:%>%{D%}%{u%}ли%{ː%}  POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
%<locdir%>:%>%{i%}кл%{Э%}%{ː%} POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
%<allprl%>:%>%{i%}кли%{ː%} POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}ук POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
%<ela%>:%>%{G%}ит%{д%} POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
%<com-nun%>:%>нун POSS-SG-N-CLITICS ;
%<com-nan%>:%>н%{Э%}н POSS-SG-N-CLITICS ;
%<com-gali%>:%>%{G%}%{Э%}ли POSS-SG-CLITICS ;

LEXICON NOMINAL-INFL-OBLIGATORY-POSS

%<sg%>%<nom%>: POSS-SG-REF ;
%<sg%>: CASE-OBL-OBLIGATORY-POSS ;
%<sg%>%<ins%>:%>%{i%}т%{д%} POSS-SG-REF ;
%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>%{i%}л POSS-PL-CLITICS ;
%<pl%>:%>%{i%}л CASE-OBL-OBLIGATORY-POSS ;
%<pl%>%<ins%>:%>%{i%}л%>ди POSS-SG-REF ;

LEXICON NOMINAL-INFL-SG

%<sg%>%<nom%>: POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
%<sg%>: CASE-OBL-POSS ;
%<sg%>%<ins%>:%>%{i%}т%{д%} POSS-SG-CLITICS ;

LEXICON NOMINAL-INFL-PL

%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>%{i%}л POSS-PL-CLITICS ;
%<pl%>:%>%{i%}л CASE-OBL-POSS ;
%<pl%>%<ins%>:%>%{i%}л%>ди POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
%<pl-sal%>%<nom%>:%>с%{Э%}л POSS-PL-CLITICS ;
%<pl-sal%>:%>с%{Э%}л CASE-OBL-POSS ;
%<pl-sal%>%<ins%>:%>с%{Э%}л%>ди POSS-SG-CLITICS ;

LEXICON NOMINAL-INFL

NOMINAL-INFL-SG ;
NOMINAL-INFL-PL ;

LEXICON N-SG

NOMINAL-INFL-SG ;
%<indposs%>:%>ӈ%{i%}%{ː%} NOMINAL-INFL-SG ;

LEXICON N-PL

NOMINAL-INFL-PL ;
%<indposs%>:%>ӈ%{i%}%{ː%} NOMINAL-INFL-PL ;

LEXICON N

N-SG ;
N-PL ;

LEXICON POSSESSION-EQUATION-ETC

%<attr-či%>:%>чи%{ː%} CLITICS ;
%<attr-či%>:%>чи%{ː%} CASE-OBL ;
%<attr-či%>%<ins%>:%>чи%{ː%}%>т%{д%} CLITICS ;
%<attr-či%>%<pl%>:%>чи%{ː%}%>л CLITICS ;
%<attr-či%>%<pl%>:%>чи%{ː%}%>л CASE-OBL ;
%<attr-či%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:%>чи%{ː%}%>л%>ит%{д%} CLITICS ;

%<attr-lan%>:%>л%{Э%}%{ː%}н CLITICS ;
%<attr-lan%>:%>л%{Э%}%{ː%}н CASE-OBL ;
%<attr-lan%>%<ins%>:%>л%{Э%}%{ː%}н%>ди CLITICS ;
%<attr-lan%>%<pl%>:%>л%{Э%}%{ː%}%>р CLITICS ;
%<attr-lan%>%<pl%>:%>л%{Э%}%{ː%}%>р CASE-OBL ;
%<attr-lan%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:%>л%{Э%}%{ː%}%>р%>ди CLITICS ;

%<lkan%>:%>лк%{Э%}%{ː%}н CLITICS ;
%<lkan%>:%>лк%{Э%}%{ː%}н CASE-OBL ;
%<lkan%>%<ins%>:%>лк%{Э%}%{ː%}н%>ди CLITICS ;
%<lkan%>%<pl%>:%>лк%{Э%}%{ː%}%>р CLITICS ;
%<lkan%>%<pl%>:%>лк%{Э%}%{ː%}%>р CASE-OBL ;
%<lkan%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:%>лк%{Э%}%{ː%}%>р%>ди CLITICS ;

%<com-taj%>:%>т%{Э%}й CLITICS ;
%<com-taj%>:%>т%{Э%}й CASE-OBL ;
%<com-taj%>%<ins%>:%>т%{Э%}й%>%{i%}т%{д%} CLITICS ;
%<com-taj%>%<pl%>:%>т%{Э%}й%>%{i%}л CLITICS ;
%<com-taj%>%<pl%>:%>т%{Э%}й%>%{i%}л CASE-OBL ;
%<com-taj%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:%>т%{Э%}й%>%{i%}л%>%{i%}т%{д%} CLITICS ;

%<eqt-gačin%>:%{G%}%{Э%}чин POSS-SG-N-CLITICS ;
%<eqt-gačin%>:%{G%}%{Э%}чин CASE-OBL-POSS ;
%<eqt-gačin%>%<ins%>:%{G%}%{Э%}чин%>ди POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
%<eqt-gačin%>%<pl%>:%{G%}%{Э%}чи%>р POSS-PL-CLITICS ;
%<eqt-gačin%>%<pl%>:%{G%}%{Э%}чи%>р CASE-OBL-POSS ;
%<eqt-gačin%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:%{G%}%{Э%}чи%>р%>ди POSS-SG-CLITICS ;

%<eqt-dyn%>:%{D%}ын CLITICS ;
%<eqt-dyn%>:%{D%}ын CASE-OBL ;
%<eqt-dyn%>%<ins%>:%{D%}ын%>ди CLITICS ;
%<eqt-dyn%>%<pl%>:%{D%}ы%>с%{Э%}л CLITICS ;
%<eqt-dyn%>%<pl%>:%{D%}ы%>с%{Э%}л CASE-OBL ;
%<eqt-dyn%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:%{D%}ы%>с%{Э%}л%>%{i%}т%{д%} CLITICS ;

%<advz-lak%>:%>л%{Э%}к CLITICS ;
%<advz-t%>:%>т CLITICS ;
%<advz-ski%>:%>ски CLITICS ;
%<advz-lta%>:%>лта CLITICS ;

LEXICON INTS-ATTEN

%<atten1%>:%>к%{Э%}%{ː%} N-N ;
%<atten1%>:%>к%{Э%}%{ː%}к%{Э%}%{ː%} N-N ; ! Dir/LR
%<atten2%>:%>ми N ;
%<atten3%>:%>ки%{ː%} N ;
%<pejor%>:%>ч%{Э%}%{ː%} N-N ;
%<ints1%>:%>к%{Э%}%{ː%}ку N-N ;
%<ints2%>:%>пч%{Э%}%{ː%}нэ N ;
%<ints3%>:%>м%{Э%}м%{Э%} N ;
%<ints3%>:%>м%{Э%} N ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON N-DERIV-ETC

POSSESSION-EQUATION-ETC ;
INTS-ATTEN ;

%<coll%>:%>%{Е%} N ;
%<box%>:%>рук N ;
%<pelt%>:%>кс%{Э%} N ;
%<fan%>:%>м%{Э%}%{ː%} N-N ;
%<place1%>:%>г N ; ! Fixme
%<place2%>:%>с%{Э%} N ; ! Fixme
%<place3%>:%>с%{Э%}%{ː%}г N ; ! Fixme ка%{ː%}г in Boldyrev
%<bush%>:%>мкур%{Э%}%{ː%} N ;
%<ptun%>:%>пту N-N ;
%<geo%>:%>ӈн%{Э%} N ;
%<resident%>:%>г%{Э%} N-N ;
%<fake%>:%>р%{Э%} N-N ;
%<material%>:%>ӈ%{Э%}%{ː%}т N ;
%<animal%>:%>ты%{ː%} N ;
%<fag%>:%>мты N ;
%<man-fan%>:%>м%{Э%}ги N-N ;
%<season%>:%>л%{Э%}с%{Э%} N ;
%<deadrel%>:%>ӈ%{Э%}с%{Э%} N ;
%<clothes%>:%>сик N ;
%<plurality%>:%>н%{Э%}к N ;
%<space%>:%>р%{Э%}к N ;
%<old%>:%>ми%{ː%} N ;
%<side%>:%>%{G%}ид%{Э%}%{ː%} N ;
%<side%>:%>%{G%}д%{Э%}%{ː%} N ;
%<accompaniment%>:%>н%{Э%} N-N ;
%<group%>:%>%{Е%} N ;
%<lim%>:%>рикт%{Э%} N ;
%<every%>:%>тыки N-N ;
%<concession%>:%>м%{Э%}%{ː%}т N ;
%<nearly%>:%>м%{Э%}ю N ;
%<mni%>:мни%{ː%} N ; ! принадлежность женщины к роду, национальности

%<attr1%>:%>м%{Э%} A ; ! a quality denoting material expressed by the base root
%<attr2%>:%>%{D%}ы%{ː%} A ; ! a quality conditioned by the object expressed by the base root
%<attr-ptɨ%>:%>пты A ; ! temporal quality
%<attr4%>:%>гу%{ː%} A ; ! locative meaning Fixme
%<attr5%>:%>ву A ; ! locative meaning Fixme
%<attr6%>:%>гд%{Э%} A ; ! a quality conditioned by an object expressed by the base root
%<attr7%>:%>р%{Э%}гд%{Э%} A ; ! quality involving an object expressed by the base root
%<attr8%>:%>мигд%{Э%} A ; ! possessing an object expressed by the base root
%<attr9%>:%>ктур%{Э%} A ; ! possessing an object expressed by the base root
%<attr10%>:%>рикт%{Э%} A ; ! possessing an object expressed by the base root
%<attr11%>:%>р%{Э%} A ; ! possessing a quality conditioned by the object expressed by the base
%<attr12%>:%>си A ; ! minlang
%<attr13%>:%>р A ; ! признак по времени

%<vblz1%>:%>м%{Э%}%{ː%} V ; ! hunt
%<vblz2%>:%>м%{Э%} V ; ! go and bring
%<vblz3%>:%>ми V ; ! hunt
%<vblz4%>:%>л%{Э%}%{ː%} V ; ! go and gather
%<vblz5%>:%>л%{Э%} V ; ! (gather and) bring
%<vblz6%>:%>ли%{ː%} V ; ! go and bring
%<vblz7%>:%>ӈ V ; ! make/build/cook/sew
%<vblz8%>:%>т%{Э%} V ; ! live in /use an object for one's advantage + different meanings
%<vblz9%>:%>д%{Э%} V ; ! perform an action with the object expressed by the root
%<vblz10%>:%>ты%{ː%} V ; ! eat
%<vblz11%>:%>му V ; ! smell
%<vblz12%>:%>%{V%}%{u%} V ; ! act with an object expressed by the root
%<vblz13%>:%>%{i%}л V ; ! different meanings
%<vblz14%>:%>м%{Э%}т V ; ! reciprocal meaning
%<vblz15%>:%>лды V ; ! reciprocal meaning
%<vblz16%>:%>к%{Э%}т V ; ! play
%<vblz17%>:%>г%{Э%} V ; ! act with the object expressed by the root
%<vblz18%>:%>г%{Э%} V ; ! act with the object expressed by the root
%<vblz19%>:%>мк%{Э%} V ; ! test
%<vblz20%>:%>р%{Э%} V ; ! perform an action which involves an object expressed by the root
%<vblz21%>:%>н%{Э%} V ; ! perform an action involving an object expressed by the root

LEXICON NOUN

%<n%>: N ;
%<n%>: N-DERIV-ETC ;
%<n%>%<child%>:%>тк%{Э%}%{ː%} N-N ;
!%<n%>%<child%>:%>т N ; ! Dir/LR
!%<n%>%<child%>:%>т N ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON NOUN-SG

%<n%>: N-SG ;
%<n%>: N-DERIV-ETC ;
%<n%>%<child%>:%>тк%{Э%}%{ː%} N-N ;
!%<n%>%<child%>:%>т N ; ! Dir/LR
!%<n%>%<child%>:%>т N ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON NOUN-PL

%<n%>: N-PL ;
%<n%>: N-DERIV-ETC ;

LEXICON NOMINAL-INFL-N-SG

%<sg%>%<nom%>:н POSS-SG-N-CLITICS ;
%<sg%>:н CASE-OBL-POSS ;
%<sg%>%<ins%>:н%>ди POSS-SG-CLITICS ;

 LEXICON Nouns
агибуга:агибуга NOUN ; ! "родина (место рождения)"
акари:акари NOUN ; ! 
акӣн:акни%{ː%} NOUN-PL ; ! 
алгис:алгис NOUN ; ! 
амӣн:амты%{ː%} NOUN-PL ; ! 
ампар:ампар%{☭%} NOUN ; ! from Russian
аӈир:аӈир NOUN ; ! 
арифметика:арифметика%{☭%} NOUN ; ! from Russian
аси:аси NOUN-SG ;
аси:аса NOUN-PL ;
атырканмӣ:атырканми%{ː%} NOUN ; ! 
аяралдыдери:аяралдыдери NOUN ; ! "мировой II (примирительный)"
балды̄вка̄ннэ:балды%{ː%}вка%{ː%}ннэ NOUN ; ! 
барки:барки%{☭%} NOUN ; ! from Russian
билат:билат NOUN ; ! 
бог:бог NOUN ; ! бог
бомбардировщик:бомбардировщик%{☭%} NOUN ; ! from Russian
брелок:брелок%{☭%} NOUN ; ! from Russian
букӣка̄:буки%{ː%}ка%{ː%} NOUN ; ! 
булэсэ:булэсэ NOUN ; ! 
бутадяри:бутадяри NOUN ; ! 
бэлухэ:бэлухэ%{☭%} NOUN ; ! from Russian
ваӈур:ваӈур NOUN ; ! 
военнообязаннай:военнообязаннай NOUN ; ! "военнообязанный"
галды̄кӣт:галды%{ː%}ки%{ː%}т NOUN ; ! "женитьба"
геда:геда NOUN ; ! 
гирамнадя:гирамнадя NOUN ; ! 
голке:голке NOUN ; ! 
грек:грек%{☭%} NOUN ; ! from Russian
гӯмэ̄тнэ:гу%{ː%}мэ%{ː%}тнэ NOUN ; ! 
гэшэгэ:гэшэгэ NOUN ; ! 
дам:дам NOUN ; ! 
девупты:девупты NOUN ; ! 
дёлоки:дёлоки NOUN ; ! 
десиӈи:десиӈи NOUN ; ! 
директива:директива%{☭%} NOUN ; ! from Russian
долбортыки:долбортыки NOUN ; ! 
дукумӈу:дукумӈу NOUN ; ! ! couldn't find in freq_list
ды̄вэктэ:ды%{ː%}вэктэ NOUN ; ! 
дыргана:дыргана NOUN ; ! 
дэктэннэ:дэктэннэ NOUN ; ! "оперение"
дювуктэ:дювуктэ NOUN ; ! "оса зоол."
дюмкирэ:дюмкирэ NOUN ; ! 
дялгуг:дялгуг NOUN ; ! 
ёко̄ды:ёко%{ː%}ды NOUN ; ! 
заведение:заведение%{☭%} NOUN ; ! from Russian
ивгунда:ивгунда NOUN ; ! 
изобретатель:изобретатель%{☭%} NOUN ; ! from Russian
илдехэ̄:илдехэ%{ː%} NOUN ; ! 
имӈэктэмкурэ:имӈэктэмкурэ NOUN ; ! 
инӈак:инӈак NOUN ; ! 
ипкэдерӣ:ипкэдери%{ː%} NOUN ; ! 
иркукэ:иркукэ NOUN ; ! 
итывумнӣ:итывумни%{ː%}%{а%} NOUN ; ! "организатор"! couldn't find in freq_list
кабина:кабина%{☭%} NOUN ; ! from Russian
калдяну:калдяну NOUN ; ! 
каняк:каняк NOUN ; ! 
каравучимнӣ:каравучимни%{ː%} NOUN ; ! 
качикамкура:качикамкура NOUN ; ! 
кигдигадярӣ:кигдигадяри%{ː%} NOUN ; ! 
киӈлэ̄:киӈлэ%{ː%} NOUN ; ! "голица обл. (лыжа зверолова)"
кихэм:кихэм NOUN ; ! 
колхозов:колхозов NOUN ; ! колхозов
коӈномукта:коӈномукта NOUN ; ! 
крыльцо:крыльцо%{☭%} NOUN ; ! from Russian
куӈакта:куӈакта NOUN ; ! 
кучикамкура:кучикамкура NOUN ; ! 
кэхиевчэ:кэхиевчэ NOUN ; ! 
ло̄бкай:ло%{ː%}бкай NOUN ; ! 
лэрэдэ:лэрэдэ NOUN ; ! 
ме̄линки:ме%{ː%}линки NOUN ; ! 
монгол:монгол NOUN ; ! "монгол"
мохик:мохик NOUN ; ! 
мӯ:му%{ː%}%{э%} NOUN ; ! вода! added from freq_list мӯвэ
мэнэк:мэнэк NOUN ; ! 
неводе:неводе NOUN ; ! "невод NOUN newəďe-dū"
нилгэ:нилгэ NOUN ; ! "яма"
нулгичи:нулгичи%{э%} NOUN ; ! ! added from freq_list нулгичикирвэр
нюкэктэ:нюкэктэ NOUN ; ! 
ӈа̄мэнды:ӈа%{ː%}мэнды NOUN ; ! 
ӈэнэмурӣ:ӈэнэмури%{ː%} NOUN ; ! 
олдоксол:олдоксол NOUN ; ! 
оӈо:оӈо NOUN ; ! "нос (лодки)"
очокӣ:очоки%{ː%} NOUN ; ! 
пионер:пионер%{☭%} NOUN ; ! from Russian
почта:почта%{☭%} NOUN ; ! from Russian
путэгэ̄ррук:путэгэ%{ː%}ррук NOUN ; ! 
са̄вувдерӣ:са%{ː%}вувдери%{ː%} NOUN ; ! 
свечка:свечка%{☭%} NOUN ; ! from Russian
силэгимнэ:силэгимнэ NOUN ; ! 
совотэ:совотэ NOUN ; ! 
станок:станок%{☭%} NOUN ; ! from Russian
сурбакта:сурбакта NOUN ; ! 
тавучарӣ:тавучари%{ː%} NOUN ; ! 
таукта:таукта NOUN ; ! 
то̄рег:то%{ː%}рег NOUN ; ! 
туӈулир:туӈулир NOUN ; ! ! couldn't find in freq_list
тымрэ:тымрэ NOUN ; ! 
тэмиктэ:тэмиктэ NOUN ; ! "пульс"
ӯдякӣт:у%{ː%}дяки%{ː%}т NOUN ; ! "дорожка I (тропа)"
ӯмил:у%{ː%}мил NOUN ; ! ! couldn't find in freq_list
урӯнчэдерӣ:уру%{ː%}нчэдери%{ː%} NOUN ; ! 
фуфайка:фуфайка%{☭%} NOUN ; ! from Russian
хӣвэ̄ӈкӣ:хи%{ː%}вэ%{ː%}ӈки%{ː%} NOUN ; ! "брусок (точильный камень)"
хугӣ:хуги%{ː%}%{э%} NOUN ; ! ! couldn't find in freq_list
хэгдыӈэхэ:хэгдыӈэхэ NOUN ; ! "взрослый сущ."
хатами:хатами NOUN ; ! 
хоромой:хоромой NOUN ; ! 
хэлбилэ:хэлбилэ NOUN ; ! 
чапэра:чапэра NOUN ; ! 
чӣптырӣ:чи%{ː%}птыри%{ː%} NOUN ; ! ! couldn't find in freq_list
чӯкэ:чу%{ː%}кэ NOUN ; ! 
чэпэчэ̄:чэпэчэ%{ː%} NOUN ; ! 
шулика:шулика NOUN ; ! 
экӣн:экни%{ː%} NOUN-PL ; !
элбэтчэрӣ:элбэтчэри%{ː%} NOUN ; ! 
энӣн:энты%{ː%} NOUN-PL ;
эрӣсэмнэ:эри%{ː%}сэмнэ NOUN ; ! 
яӈура̄:яӈура%{ː%} NOUN ; ! 
нируса:нируса NOUN ;
 LEXICON Verbs
эӈи%<part-neg%>:эӈи NOMINAL-INFL ;
